lexc/noun/enhuero.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl

+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter

§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §k§
§VV§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§ §JJ§ §b§ §h§ §n§ §r§ §t§
§oooe2§ §oeoez22§ §AAA2§ §AA2§ §uue2§ §oeoez25§ §oeoe2§

LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun4
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss4;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur4;

LEXICON Poss4
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam4;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam4;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam4;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam4;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam4;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam4;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam4;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam4;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam4;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam4;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam4;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam4;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                  Case5;

LEXICON Plur4
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen4;
                            Case5;
 
LEXICON Fam4
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen4;
                       Gen4;

LEXICON Gen4
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case4; ! erejéétől
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case4; ! erejeiétől
                         Case4; ! erejétől 
 
LEXICON Case4
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case5


LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case1; ! erejéétől
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case1; ! erejeiétől
                         Case1; ! erejétől 

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun6
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss6;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur6;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam61;

LEXICON Poss6
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam6;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam6;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam6;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam6;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam6;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam6;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam6;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam6;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam6;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam6;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam6;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam6;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam61;

LEXICON Plur6
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen6;
                            Gen61;
        
LEXICON Fam6
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen6;
                       Gen6;
LEXICON Fam61
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen6;
                       Gen61;

LEXICON Gen6
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case6;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case6;
                       Case6;
LEXICON Gen61
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case6;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case6;
                       Case61;
 
LEXICON Case6
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case61
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
!+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
!+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun8
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Case8;

LEXICON Noun
ajándékidő:ajándékidej AddNoun1;
atomerő:atomerej AddNoun1;
birkavelő:birkavelej AddNoun1;
bokszbíró:bokszbír AddNoun8;
bokszbíró:bokszbírá AddNoun6;
burjánmező:burjánmezej AddNoun1;
bányabíró:bányabír AddNoun8;
bányabíró:bányabírá AddNoun6;
béresbíró:béresbír AddNoun8;
béresbíró:béresbírá AddNoun6;
bükkmakkerdő:bükkmakkerdej AddNoun1;
cigánybíró:cigánybír AddNoun8;
cigánybíró:cigánybírá AddNoun6;
cseppkőzászló:cseppkőzászlaj AddNoun1;
csókaszőlő:csókaszőlej AddNoun1;
célbíró:célbír AddNoun8;
célbíró:célbírá AddNoun6;
diófaerdő:diófaerdej AddNoun1;
döntőbíró:döntőbír AddNoun8;
döntőbíró:döntőbírá AddNoun6;
elektródaerdő:elektródaerdej AddNoun1;
elő:el AddNoun4;
esküdtbíró:esküdtbír AddNoun8;
esküdtbíró:esküdtbírá AddNoun6;
ezredzászló:ezredzászlaj AddNoun1;
fajtaszakbíró:fajtaszakbír AddNoun8;
fajtaszakbíró:fajtaszakbírá AddNoun6;
feltételmező:feltételmezej AddNoun1;
focibíró:focibír AddNoun8;
focibíró:focibírá AddNoun6;
forrasztózászló:forrasztózászlaj AddNoun1;
függönytető:függönytetej AddNoun1;
főbíró:főbír AddNoun8;
főbíró:főbírá AddNoun6;
gerendamező:gerendamezej AddNoun1;
gyakornokbíró:gyakornokbír AddNoun8;
gyakornokbíró:gyakornokbírá AddNoun6;
gyökérmező:gyökérmezej AddNoun1;
gólbíró:gólbír AddNoun8;
gólbíró:gólbírá AddNoun6;
hamumező:hamumezej AddNoun1;
hegybíró:hegybír AddNoun8;
hegybíró:hegybírá AddNoun6;
hordóajtó:hordóajtaj AddNoun1;
hőbíró:hőbír AddNoun8;
hőbíró:hőbírá AddNoun6;
hűtőzászló:hűtőzászlaj AddNoun1;
iskolabíró:iskolabír AddNoun8;
iskolabíró:iskolabírá AddNoun6;
jelenidő:jelenidej AddNoun1;
kalózzászló:kalózzászlaj AddNoun1;
kanyarbíró:kanyarbír AddNoun8;
kanyarbíró:kanyarbírá AddNoun6;
kegyelemidő:kegyelemidej AddNoun1;
kiválasztómező:kiválasztómezej AddNoun1;
kolbászbíró:kolbászbír AddNoun8;
kolbászbíró:kolbászbírá AddNoun6;
kormányzászló:kormányzászlaj AddNoun1;
kosárbíró:kosárbír AddNoun8;
kosárbíró:kosárbírá AddNoun6;
kátránytető:kátránytetej AddNoun1;
közerő:közerej AddNoun1;
középbíró:középbír AddNoun8;
középbíró:középbírá AddNoun6;
lenyomóerő:lenyomóerej AddNoun1;
létidő:létidej AddNoun1;
meggyvessző:meggyvesszej AddNoun1;
megyebíró:megyebír AddNoun8;
megyebíró:megyebírá AddNoun6;
motorerő:motorerej AddNoun1;
másodbíró:másodbír AddNoun8;
másodbíró:másodbírá AddNoun6;
műterembelső:műterembelsej AddNoun1;
nyírseprű:nyírseprej AddNoun1;
nádorbíró:nádorbír AddNoun8;
nádorbíró:nádorbírá AddNoun6;
országbíró:országbír AddNoun8;
országbíró:országbírá AddNoun6;
ostromidő:ostromidej AddNoun1;
pajtabíró:pajtabír AddNoun8;
pajtabíró:pajtabírá AddNoun6;
pavilontető:pavilontetej AddNoun1;
pernyebíró:pernyebír AddNoun8;
pernyebíró:pernyebírá AddNoun6;
prófétazászló:prófétazászlaj AddNoun1;
pusztabíró:pusztabír AddNoun8;
pusztabíró:pusztabírá AddNoun6;
pólóbíró:pólóbír AddNoun8;
pólóbíró:pólóbírá AddNoun6;
reformerő:reformerej AddNoun1;
rendőrbíró:rendőrbír AddNoun8;
rendőrbíró:rendőrbírá AddNoun6;
répamező:répamezej AddNoun1;
sorolómező:sorolómezej AddNoun1;
startbíró:startbír AddNoun8;
startbíró:startbírá AddNoun6;
szavazóbíró:szavazóbír AddNoun8;
szavazóbíró:szavazóbírá AddNoun6;
szelepbelső:szelepbelsej AddNoun1;
szálfaerdő:szálfaerdej AddNoun1;
szénabíró:szénabír AddNoun8;
szénabíró:szénabírá AddNoun6;
sárgazászló:sárgazászlaj AddNoun1;
sávbíró:sávbír AddNoun8;
sávbíró:sávbírá AddNoun6;
tanárbíró:tanárbír AddNoun8;
tanárbíró:tanárbírá AddNoun6;
teljesítménybíró:teljesítménybír AddNoun8;
teljesítménybíró:teljesítménybírá AddNoun6;
toleranciaidő:toleranciaidej AddNoun1;
táblabíró:táblabír AddNoun8;
táblabíró:táblabírá AddNoun6;
távbíró:távbír AddNoun8;
távbíró:távbírá AddNoun6;
tőkevonzerő:tőkevonzerej AddNoun1;
udvarbíró:udvarbír AddNoun8;
udvarbíró:udvarbírá AddNoun6;
versenyszámbíró:versenyszámbír AddNoun8;
versenyszámbíró:versenyszámbírá AddNoun6;
viharbíró:viharbír AddNoun8;
viharbíró:viharbírá AddNoun6;
vizsgálóajtó:vizsgálóajtaj AddNoun1;
vonalbíró:vonalbír AddNoun8;
vonalbíró:vonalbírá AddNoun6;
vármegyebíró:vármegyebír AddNoun8;
vármegyebíró:vármegyebírá AddNoun6;
zálogbíró:zálogbír AddNoun8;
zálogbíró:zálogbírá AddNoun6;
átütőerő:átütőerej AddNoun1;
égettborbíró:égettborbírá AddNoun6;
